Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1603
Provisions applicable.

A bankers bank shall be subject to the Nebraska Banking Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1986, LB 1123, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 73;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 28.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.02.